Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-104.01
Interest; political subdivisions; delinquent taxes; special assessments.

Unless otherwise specifically provided, the interest rate assessed on delinquent payments of any taxes or special assessments owing to any political subdivision of the State of Nebraska shall be assessed at a rate of fourteen percent per annum.

Laws 1981, LB 167, § 1;

Laws 1992, Fourth Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 4.

Under the former law, if an obligation to pay interest arises under section 67-405 and the rate is not specified, the rate is that specified in this section. Robertson v. Jacobs Cattle Co., 285 Neb. 859, 830 N.W.2d 191 (2013).

This statutory provision does not mandate the assessment of interest on delinquent taxes; rather, it sets the rate at which such interest will be assessed. Ameritas Life Ins. Corp. v. Balka, 257 Neb. 878, 601 N.W.2d 508 (1999).